Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202664-306
Fee.

The fee for registering or reregistering as an electronic notary shall be in addition to the fee required in section 33-102. The Secretary of State shall establish the fee by rule and regulation in an amount sufficient to cover the costs of administering the Electronic Notary Public Act, but the fee shall not exceed one hundred dollars. The Secretary of State shall remit fees received under this section to the State Treasurer for credit to the Secretary of State Cash Fund for use in administering the Electronic Notary Public Act.

Laws 2016, LB465, § 6;

Laws 2020, LB910, § 23.